District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Medical Cannabis Process Improvement Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Legalization of Marijuana for Medical Treatment Initiative of 1999, effective
February 25, 2010 (D.C. Law 13-315; D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.01 et seq.), is amended as
follows:


(a) Section 2(5A) (D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.01(5A)) is repealed.
(b) Section 7(q) (D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.06(q)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “preschool,
primary or secondary school, or recreation center; except, that a license holder or an applicant who
has applied prior to December 17, 2024 shall not be permitted to locate within 300 feet of a
preschool, primary or secondary school, or recreation center” and inserting the phrase “child
development facility, as defined in section 2(3) of the Child Development Facilities Regulation
Act of 1998, effective April 13, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-215; D.C. Official Code § 7-2031(3)),
preschool, primary or secondary school, or recreation center; except, that a license holder or an
applicant who has applied prior to December 17, 2024 shall not be permitted to locate within 300
feet of a child development facility, as defined in section 2(3) of the Child Development Facilities
Regulation Act of 1998, effective April 13, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-215; D.C. Official Code § 7-
2031(3)), preschool, primary or secondary school, or recreation center” in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “preschool,
primary or secondary school, or recreation center where the main entrance to the preschool,
primary school or secondary school, or recreation center” and inserting the phrase “child
development facility, as defined in section 2(3) of the Child Development Facilities Regulation
Act of 1998, effective April 13, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-215; D.C. Official Code § 7-2031(3)),
preschool, primary or secondary school, or recreation center where the main entrance to the child
development facility, preschool, primary school or secondary school, or recreation center” in its
place.


(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “preschool, primary or
secondary school, or recreation center subsequently locates within 400 feet of its facility” and
inserting the phrase “child development facility, as defined in section 2(3) of the Child
Development Facilities Regulation Act of 1998, effective April 13, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-215; D.C.
Official Code § 7-2031(3)), preschool, primary or secondary school, or recreation center
subsequently locates within 400 feet of its facility” in its place.
(c) Section 7g(a) (D.C. Official Code § 7–1671.06g(a)) is amended by striking the phrase
“medical cannabis retailer license” and inserting the phrase “medical cannabis retailer or internet
retailer license” in its place.
(d) Section 7i(a) (D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.06i) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a semicolon
in its place.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended to read as follows:
“(3) The effect of the establishment upon residential parking needs and vehicular
and pedestrian safety;”.
(3) New paragraphs (4) and (5) are added to read as follows:
“(4) The effect of the establishment on peace, order, and quiet; and
“(5) The inability of the provisions of this act or rules issued pursuant to section 14
of this act to prevent proximity or undue exposure to children.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).


Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.